Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 477.985 is amended to read:
477.985. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Credible witness” means a person who  has observed conduct alleged to constitute a
violation and whose statement about the observation is reliable based on:
(A) The content of the observation;
(B) The circumstances around the observation; and
(C) Whether the observation is consistent with any other evidence.
(b) “Enforcement officer”  means the State Forester or a person authorized by the State
Forester.
(2) [In addition to any other persons permitted to enforce violations,  the State Forestry Department
and the State Forester, or  any employee specifically designated by the department or by the State
Forester, ] An enforcement officer  may  issue [ citations for violations ] a citation for a violation
established under ORS 477.993 in the manner provided by ORS chapter 153.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 153.042, an enforcement  officer may issue a citation for a vio-
lation as  described in subsection (2) of this section when the enforcement officer did not
observe the conduct alleged to constitute a violation if the enforcement officer has  probable
cause to believe that the conduct  constitutes a violation based on physical evidence or a
statement provided by a credible witness.
Enrolled House Bill 2819 (HB 2819-B) Page 1
Passed by House March 18, 2025
Repassed by House June 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2819 (HB 2819-B) Page 2